Utah, session 2026, HB563.
Section 1. Section 58-55-308.2 is enacted to read:58-55-308.2. Radon mitigation.(1)This section applies to:(a)a person that is licensed to install, repair, maintain, clean, or replace a radon mitigation system; and(b)an individual who sells radon mitigation or vents a radon mitigation system.(2)A person described in Subsection (1) shall:(a)before beginning the work described in Subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b), receive training and certification in accordance with rules the commission makes with the concurrence of the director and in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and(b)ensure that an employee performing work described in Subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) first receives training and certification as the division requires by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.(3)The division may exempt an individual from the certification requirements described in Subsection (2) who works under the direct supervision of a certified individual in accordance with Subsection (2).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.